src/fst/morphology/incoming/yaml_test_relaxer.regex
define relax [ á á (->) a a,
í í (->) i i,
ó ó (->) o o,

a a (->) á á,
i i (->) í í,
o o (->) ó ó,

á (->) a,
í (->) i,
ó (->) o,

a (->) á,
i (->) í,
o (->) ó,

a a a (->) a a,
a a (->) a a a,
i i i (->) i i,
i i (->) i i i,
o o o (->) o o,
o o (->) o o o,
i i (->) i,
í í (->) í,
í í (->) i,
a a (->) a,
á á (->) á,
á á (->) a,
o o (->) o,
ó ó (->) o,
ó ó (->) ó,
i (->) i i,
a (->) a a,
o (->) o o,
í (->) í í,
i (->) í í,
á (->) á á,
a (->) á á,
ó (->) ó ó,
o (->) ó ó

] ;
